Maryland, session 2026, HB0325.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
6–703.
(a) (1) The Board consists of the following members:
(i) Eight public school classroom teachers, as follows:
1. Six chosen from a list of nominees provided by the
statewide teachers’ organization representing a majority of teachers in the State for
collective bargaining purposes; and
2. Two chosen from a list of nominees provided by a
statewide teachers’ organization representing teachers in at least one jurisdiction within
the State for collective bargaining purposes other than the majority organization provided
for in item 1 of this item;
(ii) [One certified nonpublic school classroom teacher, chosen from a
list of nominees provided by the Association of Independent Schools;
– 1 –

Ch. 728 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii)] Six teacher education faculty members from colleges of the State,
chosen from a list of nominees provided by:
1. The Maryland Association of Teacher Educators; and
2. The Maryland Association of Colleges of Teacher
Education;
[(iv)] (III) Four administrative or supervisory staff members of
public schools, as follows:
1. Two chosen from a list of nominees provided by the Public
School Superintendents’ Association of Maryland;
2. One chosen from a list of nominees provided by the
Maryland Association of Secondary Principals; and
3. One chosen from a list of nominees provided by the
Maryland Association of Elementary School Administrators;
[(v)] (IV) One administrative or supervisory staff of the approved
nonpublic schools of the State, chosen from a list of nominees provided by the Association
of Independent Schools;
[(vi)] (V) One member of a local board of education, chosen from a
list of nominees provided by the Maryland Association of Boards of Education;
[(vii)] (VI) [One member] TWO MEMBERS REPRESENTATIVES of
the Maryland Association of Nonpublic Special Education Facilities, chosen from a list of
nominees provided by the Maryland Association of Nonpublic Special Education Facilities
AS FOLLOWS:
1. ONE LICENSED SPECIAL EDUCATION TEACHER
CURRENTLY PROVIDING CLASSROOM INSTRUCTION, CHOSEN FROM A LIST OF
NOMINEES PROVIDED BY THE MARYLAND ASSOCIATION OF NONPUBLIC SPECIAL
EDUCATION FACILITIES; AND
2. ONE ADMINISTRATOR OR SUPERVISORY STAFF
MEMBER, CHOSEN FROM A LIST OF NOMINEES PROVIDED BY THE MARYLAND
ASSOCIATION OF NONPUBLIC SPECIAL EDUCATION FACILITIES;
[(viii)] (VII) Two representatives of the general public, as follows:
1. One chosen from a list of nominees provided by the
Speaker of the House of Delegates of Maryland; and
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 728
2. One chosen from a list of nominees provided by the
President of the Senate of Maryland; and
[(ix)] (VIII) The State Superintendent or a designee of the State
Superintendent.
(2) The Board shall include all the members of the Professional Standards
and Teacher Education Advisory Board serving on July 1, 1991.
(b) (1) The Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate of Maryland,
shall appoint the members of the Board described in subsection (a)(1)(i) through [(viii)]
(VII) of this section.
(2) In making the appointments required under this subsection, the
Governor shall ensure that the Board is representative of:
(i) The geographic regions of the State; and
(ii) Minority populations of the State as defined in § 9–301 of the
State Government Article.
(c) (1) The term of an appointed member is 3 years.
(2) The terms of the appointed members are staggered as required by the
terms provided for members of the Board on October 1, 1991.
(3) At the end of a term, a member continues to serve until a successor is
appointed.
(4) A member who is appointed after a term has begun serves only for the
remainder of the term and until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
(d) The Governor may remove a member for incompetence or misconduct.
(e) From among its members, the Board annually shall elect a chairman.
(f) A majority of the members of the Board then serving on the Board is a quorum.
(g) The staff for the Board shall be provided by the State Board.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 3 –